Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1901
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-1901 to 76-1916 shall be known and may be cited as the Farm Homestead Protection Act.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 3, § 1.